District of Columbia statutes.
29-605.01

Partner not co-owner of partnership property.

A partner shall not be a co-owner of partnership property and has no interest in partnership property which can be transferred, either voluntarily or involuntarily.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-155.1.
2001 Ed., § 33-105.01.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 501 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).